Florida, session 2026, SB996.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSubsection (6) is added to section 39.4085, 32 Florida Statutes, to read: 33 39.4085âGoals for dependent children; responsibilities; 34 education; Office of the Childrenâs Ombudsman.â 35 (6)(a)âThe department shall coordinate with organizations 36 that are focused on empowering children with lived experience 37 for the purpose of addressing challenges and opportunities for 38 children in the child welfare system. The department and such 39 organizations must meet at least quarterly in person or via 40 teleconference or other electronic means to solicit input on 41 ways to address such challenges and opportunities. Each meeting 42 must have a formal agenda, and such agenda and the minutes from 43 each meeting must be made available on the departmentâs website. 44 (b)âEach community-based care lead agency shall coordinate 45 with organizations that are focused on empowering children with 46 lived experience for the purpose of addressing challenges and 47 opportunities for children in the child welfare system. The 48 community-based care lead agency and such organizations must 49 meet at least quarterly in person or via teleconference or other 50 electronic means to solicit input on ways to address such 51 challenges and opportunities. Each meeting must have a formal 52 agenda, and such agenda and the minutes from each meeting must 53 be made available on the community-based care lead agencyâs 54 website. 55 (c)âBy February 1 and August 1 of each year, beginning in 56 2027, the department and each community-based care lead agency 57 must make publicly accessible on their respective websites a 58 report that outlines how the department and the community-based 59 care lead agencies have implemented the suggestions received 60 from organizations in the meetings required under paragraphs (a) 61 and (b). 62 Section 2.âPresent subsection (5) of section 409.145, 63 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (6), a new 64 subsection (5) is added to that section, and paragraph (b) of 65 subsection (2) is amended, to read: 66 409.145âCare of children; âreasonable and prudent parentâ 67 standard.âThe child welfare system of the department shall 68 operate as a coordinated community-based system of care which 69 empowers all caregivers for children in foster care to provide 70 quality parenting, including approving or disapproving a childâs 71 participation in activities based on the caregiverâs assessment 72 using the âreasonable and prudent parentâ standard. 73 (2)âREASONABLE AND PRUDENT PARENT STANDARD.â 74 (b)âApplication of standard of care.â 75 1.âEvery child who comes into out-of-home care pursuant to 76 this chapter is entitled to participate in age-appropriate 77 extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities and to 78 receive a weekly cash allowance for personal use in accordance 79 with subsection (5). 80 2.âEach caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent 81 parent standard in determining whether to give permission for a 82 child living in out-of-home care to participate in 83 extracurricular, enrichment, or social activities. When using 84 the reasonable and prudent parent standard, the caregiver must 85 consider: 86 a.âThe childâs age, maturity, and developmental level to 87 maintain the overall health and safety of the child. 88 b.âThe potential risk factors and the appropriateness of 89 the extracurricular, enrichment, or social activity. 90 c.âThe best interest of the child, based on information 91 known by the caregiver. 92 d.âThe importance of encouraging the childâs emotional and 93 developmental growth. 94 e.âThe importance of providing the child with the most 95 family-like living experience possible. 96 f.âThe behavioral history of the child and the childâs 97 ability to safely participate in the proposed activity. 98 (5)âCASH ALLOWANCE.â 99 (a)âThe Legislature finds that receiving a cash allowance 100 is a critical aspect of normalcy for a child. A cash allowance 101 teaches a child the value and use of money and promotes 102 independence, responsibility, and decisionmaking. 103 (b)âA caregiver must provide each child in his or her care, 104 beginning when the child attains 6 years of age, a weekly cash 105 allowance that is not tied to the childâs behavior or the 106 completion of the childâs chores. A caregiver may not withhold 107 the childâs allowance as a form of punishment. A child may not 108 be required to use his or her allowance to purchase personal 109 hygiene items, school supplies, clothing, or other necessities 110 that are the responsibility of the childâs caregiver. The 111 minimum allowance is as follows: 112 1.âFor children ages 6 to 12 years, $1 for each year of age 113 per week. 114 2.âFor children ages 13 to 17 years, $20 per week. 115 (c)âIn addition to providing the allowance required under 116 paragraph (b), a caregiver is encouraged to do all of the 117 following: 118 1.âOffer the opportunity to earn money through chores to a 119 child placed in his or her care. 120 2.âHelp a child placed in his or her care to obtain 121 employment, if the child wants to be employed. 122 (d)âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 123 subsection. 124 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.